Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-498] Effect of copy. A copy of
a transfer of student's rights, revocation of the power of attorney for special
education, the finding of lack of capacity, or the reconsideration of the
appointment of an educational representative has the same effect as the
original. [L 2008, c 182, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next